Hawaii statutes.
§111-4 Replacement housing. (a) In
addition to any amount authorized in this chapter, the state agency involved in
acquiring any real property shall make a payment to the owner of real property
improved by a single-family, two-family, or three-family dwelling actually
owned and occupied by the owner for not less than one year prior to the first
written offer by the state agency for the acquisition of such property. Such
payment, not to exceed $15,000, shall be the amount, if any, which when added
to the acquisition payment, equals the average price required for a comparable
dwelling determined, in accordance with standards established by the state
agency to be a decent, safe, and sanitary dwelling adequate to accommodate the
displaced owner, reasonably accessible to public services and places of
employment, and available on the private market. Such payment shall be made
only to a displaced owner who purchases and occupies a dwelling within one year
subsequent to the date on which the owner is required to move from the dwelling
on the real property acquired for public purposes.

(b) In addition to any amount authorized in
this chapter, the state agency shall make a payment to any individual or family
displaced from any dwelling not eligible to receive a payment under subsection
(a) which dwelling was actually and lawfully occupied by such individual or
family for not less than ninety days prior to the first written offer by the
state agency for acquisition of such property. Such payment, not to exceed $4,000,
shall be the amount which is necessary to enable such person to lease or rent
for a period not to exceed two years or to make the downpayment on the purchase
of a decent, safe, and sanitary dwelling of standards adequate to accommodate
such individual or family in areas not generally less desirable in regard to
public utilities and public and commercial facilities. [L 1970, c 166, §4; gen
ch 1985; am L 1988, c 95, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next